Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 7. Registration and Title Violations.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, §§ 98, 255.

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, §§ 304-306.

Roadblocks for purpose of discovering vehicular or driving violations, 37 ALR4th 10.

Sec. 28.10.450.
Failure to endorse and deliver. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.451.
Unlawful to violate provisions requiring registration and title.

A person may not wilfully attempt to defeat the provisions of this chapter or wilfully fail to title or register a vehicle as required by this chapter, or otherwise wilfully fail to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.460.
Required insurance. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.461.
Driving vehicle without evidence of registration.

Except as otherwise expressly permitted in this chapter, a person may not drive or move, nor may an owner knowingly permit to be driven or moved, on a highway or vehicular way or area, a vehicle required to be registered under this chapter unless valid registration plates, decals, or permits for the current registration period are attached to and displayed on the vehicle in the manner required by this chapter, and unless a valid certificate of registration for the current registration period is carried, as required by this chapter, in the vehicle and is available for inspection by a peace officer or an authorized representative of the Department of Public Safety.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 99 § 42 (1997))

Sec. 28.10.470.
Filing liens. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.471.
Driving vehicle when registration suspended or revoked or permit expired.

A person may not drive or move, nor may an owner knowingly permit to be driven or moved, on a highway or vehicular way or area, a vehicle for which the registration or permit has been suspended or revoked or has expired.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.480.
Filing provisions. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.481.
Improper use of evidence of registration or certificate of title.

A person may not lend to another, or knowingly permit the use by another of, a certificate of registration or title, registration plate, decal, special plate, or permit issued under this chapter if the person to whom it is loaned or whose use is permitted is not entitled to its use, nor may a person display in or upon a vehicle a certificate of registration, registration plate, decal, special plate, or permit not issued for that vehicle or not otherwise lawfully used on that vehicle.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.490.
New certificate. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.491.
Felonies relating to title, registration, identification number, and removal and representation of vehicles.

Upon conviction, a person is guilty of a felony who

alters, forges, or counterfeits a certificate of title or registration, or a registration plate, decal, tab, or sticker of this or another jurisdiction;

alters or forges an assignment of a certificate of title or an assignment or release of a security interest on a certificate of title of this or another jurisdiction or on a form the department prescribes;

has possession of or uses a certificate of title or registration, registration plate, decal, tab, or sticker of this or another jurisdiction knowing it to have been altered, forged, or counterfeited;

wilfully removes or falsifies a vehicle identification number;

wilfully conceals or misrepresents the identity of a vehicle or vehicle equipment;

buys, receives, possesses, sells, or disposes of a vehicle or vehicle equipment, knowing that a vehicle identification number or equipment has been unlawfully removed or falsified;

removes from the state a vehicle that is the subject of a security interest created under AS 28.01 — 28.35 or under AS 45.01 — 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 without the written consent of the secured party, and with intent to defraud the secured party or the state;

represents a motor vehicle or house trailer to be a new vehicle and who sells or procures the sale of that motor vehicle as a new vehicle without presenting a “manufacturer’s statement of origin”; or

makes a false statement or otherwise conceals or withholds a material fact in an application for registration or certificate of title or falsely affirms with respect to a matter required to be sworn to, affirmed, or furnished under this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter; except that a person who with criminal negligence as defined in AS

11.81.900

, falsely certifies to the department the existence of a motor vehicle liability insurance policy under AS

28.10.021(a)(2)

, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person convicted of an offense under this section is punishable by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five years, or by a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $5,000, or by both.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 54 SLA 1979; am § 20 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, under § 13, ch. 34, SLA 1993 and § 128, ch. 35, SLA 1993, the citation to the Uniform Commercial Code in paragraph (a)(7) was revised.

In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 28.10.493.
Misdemeanors relating to transfers.

The owner of a vehicle who transfers a vehicle and fails to comply with the requirements of AS

28.10.271

is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

A vehicle dealer who transfers a vehicle and fails to comply with the requirements of AS

28.10.291

is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 54 SLA 1979)

Cross references. —

For fines and sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

, respectively.